Kentucky statutes. TITLE II Legislative Branch
Privileges and Discipline — Witnesses

6.050.
Privilege from arrest or civil suit — Censure — Fine or expulsion.

A member of the General Assembly, while going to, attending or returning from any session of the house to which he belongs shall not be arrested, menaced or disturbed at any place in the Commonwealth of Kentucky except on legal process for treason, felony, or breach or surety of the peace.

It is declared to be the legislative intent of the General Assembly to prohibit the arrest of any member of the General Assembly at any place within the Commonwealth while going to, attending or returning from any session of the house to which he belongs, except for treason, felony, or breach or surety of the peace.

A member of the General Assembly shall not be required to stand trial in any civil action except between terms of the legislature, and then only in the county of his residence; but either party to such an action may obtain a change of venue as in other cases.

A member of either house, by a vote of two-thirds (2/3) of the members present, may be censured, fined, or expelled for breach of privilege.

History.

1981: amend. Acts 1966, ch. 262; 1970, ch. 92, § 1.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Constitutional privilege of members, Ky. Const., § 43.

Expulsion for voting when private interest is affected, Ky. Const., § 57.

Punishment for disorderly behavior, Ky. Const., § 39.

6.060.
Renumbered as KRS 6.072.

6.070.
Contempt or breach of privilege, punishment for.

Either house of the General Assembly may punish anyone by fine not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500) or by imprisonment not exceeding six (6) months, or both, for a breach of privilege, or for any contempt except the offenses described in KRS

6.080

, which shall be punished as provided in KRS

6.080

to

6.131

. Contempts and breaches of privilege shall be inquired into first by a special committee, before which the accused shall have the right to be heard by himself and counsel, and have compulsory process to procure the attendance of his witnesses. The committee shall report all matters of fact specially, with its opinion, for the final action of the house.

History.

1982.

6.071.
Collection and disposition of fines imposed.

All fines imposed under KRS

6.050

or

6.070

shall be collected by the sheriff of the county where the offender or his estate is found, under the mandate of the house imposing the fine, signed by its presiding officer and shall be paid into the State Treasury by the sheriff, and accounted for as other public moneys collected by him.

History.

1984.

6.072.
Witnesses before General Assembly — Privileges and compensation — Oath.

Witnesses attending the General Assembly, either house or a legislative committee are entitled to the same privileges and immunities, and the same compensation, as witnesses in other cases. When summoned by the Commonwealth, they shall be paid out of the State Treasury.

Chairmen of the committees of the Senate and House of Representatives may administer all necessary oaths to any person who appears or is called to testify before a committee of either house.

History.

1983.

6.080.
Disobedient witnesses — Attempt to corrupt legislator — Penalty — Enforcement by Attorney General.

Any person who, after being lawfully summoned by the General Assembly, either house or a committee of either, refuses to attend as a witness, or bring any paper proper to be used as evidence or who, being present, refuses to testify concerning any matter which may be a proper subject of inquiry, and any person who offers or gives a bribe to a member of the General Assembly, or attempts, by other corrupt means, to influence a member to cast or withhold his vote, shall, on conviction as provided by KRS

6.090

to

6.131

, be fined not more than fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) or imprisoned in the county jail any time during the then current session of the General Assembly, or both. The Attorney General, upon request of any committee of the General Assembly or a co-chair of the Commission, shall enforce this section in the county of residence of the accused person or in Franklin County under KRS

15.210

.

History.

1993; 2022 ch. 203, § 1, effective July 14, 2022.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Bribery, KRS

432.350

.

Bribery of public servant, KRS

521.020

.

Evasion of process to appear before legislative committee, KRS

421.080

.

Newspapermen not required to disclose source of information, KRS

421.100

.

Power of General Assembly to punish disobedient witness or person corruptly attempting to influence votes of members, Ky. Const., § 39.

Receiving unlawful compensation, KRS

521.040

.

6.090.
Charge — What to contain.

Any member of the General Assembly may make the charge against the offender in writing, and shall specify the offense in ordinary and concise language, and in such manner as to enable a person of common understanding to know what is intended, and with such degree of certainty as to enable the General Assembly, or either house, to pronounce judgment on the charge.

History.

1994.

6.100.
Procedure on charge.

If the offense was against the General Assembly, or a joint committee, the house in which the charge is filed may adopt a resolution providing for an investigation. If the resolution is concurred in by the other house, the President of the Senate shall appoint two (2) of its members and the Speaker of the House three (3) of its members, who shall constitute a joint committee of investigation. If the offense was against the house in which the charge is filed or one (1) of its committees, the President or Speaker shall appoint five (5) of its members as a committee of investigation. The committee of investigation shall select one (1) of its number chairman, who may summon and swear witnesses and require the production of papers to be used as evidence. The committee shall summon the accused to appear before it and answer the charge, and, after reasonable notice to him of the time and place of trial, shall hear testimony, and cause the testimony or its substance to be reduced to writing, and report its conclusions, with the testimony taken and its recommendations, to the house in which the charge is pending, or to the Senate if the committee is a joint committee.

History.

1995.

6.110.
Judgment on report of committee.

On the report of a joint committee, the Senate shall, by resolution, fix the penalty or discharge the accused, as the testimony authorizes. If the accused is found guilty and the resolution is concurred in by the House, he shall be punished accordingly.

If the offense was against either house or a committee of either, that house shall by resolution fix the penalty or discharge the accused, as the testimony authorizes.

History.

1996, 1997.

6.120.
Renumbered as KRS 6.131.

6.130.
Collection of fine.

If a fine is imposed under KRS

6.080

, it may be collected by action in the Franklin Circuit Court by the Attorney General, in the name of the Commonwealth, and the proceedings shall be the same as in civil cases instituted by the Commonwealth for the collection of debt.

History.

1999.

6.131.
Resolutions and orders — How enforced.

Resolutions of imprisonment and orders of either house shall be executed by the sergeant-at-arms of that house, or by any sheriff to whom the order is directed.

History.

1983, 1998.

6.140.
Renumbered as KRS 6.071.